src/morphology/stems/altstem-verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_MIELTYÄ
!! € mieltyä
0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:ly    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:ly    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:ly   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:lyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_HUMALTUA
!! € humaltua
0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:lu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:lu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:lu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:lut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_VAKAANTUA
!! € vakaantua
0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:nu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:nu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:nu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:nut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_TYHJENTYÄ
!! € tyhjentyä
0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:ny    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:ny    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:ny   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:nyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_PYÖRTYÄ
!! € pyörtyä
0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:ry    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:ry    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:ry   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ryt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:ryt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_VARTOA
!! € pusertua
0:to    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:to    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:ro    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:ro    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:to    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:to   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:ro   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:rot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:rot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_PUSERTUA
!! € pusertua
0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:ru    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:ru    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:ru   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:rut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:rut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_MUTRISTAA
!! € mutristaa
0:a      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:a      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:a      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:a      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:a      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:a        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:a        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_KIVISTÄÄ
!! € kivistää
0:ä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:ä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:ä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_RÄPSYTTÄÄ
!! € räpsyttää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä     V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_VIEROITTAA
!! € vieroittaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;


LEXICON V_PURKAA
!! € purkaa
0:ka      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ka      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ka      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ka      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ka      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ka        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ka        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_YSKÄHTÄÄ
!! € kärähtää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:d       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_MOJAHTAA
!! € mojahta
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:d       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_KYNTÄÄ
!! € kyntää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:nä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:n       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:net       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_SORTAA
!! € sortaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ra      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:r       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ret       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ret       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_HUUTAA
!! € huutaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_PYYTÄÄ
!! € pyytää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_SIVALTAA
!! € sivaltaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:la      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:le        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:let       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:let       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_VIHELTÄÄ
!! € viheltää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:lä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:le        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:let       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:let       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_HIVENTÄÄ
!! € hiventää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:nä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:net       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_HUONONTAA
!! € huonontaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:na      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:net       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:net       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_KUHERTAA
!! € kuhertaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ra      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ret       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ret       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_NÄPERTÄÄ
!! € näpertää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:rä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ret       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:ret       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_KIITÄÄ
!! € kiitää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:d       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_JOUTAA
!! € joutaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:ta      V_BACK_CONDITIONAL ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:d       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:t       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;
